California statutes. Public Resources Code
(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department is not required to prepare a general plan or revise an existing plan for a unit to which new development is necessary to comply with public service delivery obligations, operational or code compliance upgrades,
 or resource preservation requirements that are compatible with the classification of the unit. The department may instead prepare a management or development plan with appropriate environmental review and analysis.

(e) Consistent with good planning and sound resource management, the department shall, in discharging its responsibilities under this section, attempt to make units of the state park system accessible and usable by the general public at the earliest opportunity.

(f) The department may prepare a general plan that includes more than one unit of the state park system for units that are in close proximity to one another and that have similar resources and recreational opportunities if that action will facilitate the protection of public resources and public access to units of the state park system.

(g) The
 department, in consultation with the State Park and Recreation Commission, by January 1, 2018, shall provide the Legislature with recommendations for improving the state park planning and approval process to help achieve the following goals:

(1) Provide for more efficient and cost-effective development, approval, and timely updates of park unit general plans, including through the use of multi-unit general plans where appropriate.

(2) Provide for public participation in the development and update of park general plans and related planning documents.

(3) Streamline reviews carried out pursuant to the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) and other applicable statutes.

(4) Enable the department to reduce, by
 2025, the current backlog of general plans to be developed for parks that currently lack a general plan or that have an existing general plan that is more than 25 years old and requires significant revision to address pressing public access and resource management issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 201, Sec. 10.   (AB 2549)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.3.

A public hearing shall be scheduled by the State Park and Recreation Commission to consider each matter of classification or reclassification of a unit and of approval of the department’s general plan for a unit. Notice of the hearing shall be posted in plain sight at one or more places within the affected unit, published in one or more newspapers of general circulation in each county within which the affected unit is located, and mailed to every person who has filed a request for notice of the hearing with the commission. If the notice of hearing is published in a weekly newspaper, it shall appear therein on at least two
 different days of publication; and if in a newspaper published more often, there shall be at least five days from the first to the last day of publication, both days included. The content of the notice of hearing shall substantially comply with the requirements of Section 11346.5 of the Government Code.

Copies of the department’s inventory of features, in the case of a hearing on classification or reclassification, or copies of the department’s general plan, in the case of a hearing on approval of the plans, shall be made available to the public at the department’s appropriate regional and district offices on the last date of publication of the notice.

The hearing shall be held by the commission in, or within a radius of 100 miles of, the City of San Diego, Los Angeles, San Francisco, San Bernardino, Eureka, Redding, Fresno, Ukiah, Monterey, San Luis Obispo, Santa Barbara, or Sacramento, whichever is closest to the unit
 affected, not less than 30 days, nor more than 60 days, after the last date of publication of the notice. The hearing shall be conducted in the manner specified in Section 11346.8 of the Government Code. The vote of each individual member of the commission on each matter of classification or reclassification and of approval of the department’s general plan shall be recorded when the final decision of the commission is announced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1027, Sec. 1.   Effective September 19, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.4.

The department shall furnish a copy of the general plan for any unit of the state park system for which a plan has been prepared to any Member of the Legislature, upon request.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 439, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.45.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, upon completion of the land transfer authorized in Section 6 of Chapter 1234 of the Statutes of 1980, the department shall prepare a general plan or revise any existing general plan, as the case may be, for the Sinkyone Wilderness State Park. The plan shall also include the leased property described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 6 of that chapter.

(b) The general plan shall be as provided in Section 5002.2 and shall also include all of the following:

(1) Provision for a system of recreational trails connected one to another and to other recreational trails in the region.

(2) Provision for a system of nonmotorized transportation, at least for those unable to hike long distances because of age or disability. The department may contract for a privately owned and operated system of horse-drawn carriages to be operated at no cost to the state in order to provide this nonmotorized transportation.

(3) Provision for parking of motor vehicles at Usal and Low Gap or elsewhere at the perimeter of or near the Sinkyone Wilderness State Park. This may include patrolled parking areas on the perimeter of or near the park or parking lots in nearby communities with shuttle buses to the wilderness area, or both; in any case, the department may charge fees not to exceed its actual
 costs.

(4) Provision for sportfishing. In addition, notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission may consider and authorize as a part of the plan continuation of and regulation of hunting on the limited basis traditional to the area, to the extent it does not endanger human health or safety.

(5) Provision for the continuation and renewal of road easements which existed on January 1, 1980, across the park, to the extent that the roads are necessary to provide access to neighboring property.

(6) Provision for the maintenance and use of the existing structure known as Needle Rock House as a visitor-serving or interpretive facility or another use compatible with the preservation of the wilderness environment.

(7) Provision for any restrictions
 on the use of existing county roads within the park, which restrictions may be necessary to protect human health or safety, natural resources, or wilderness values of the park; and provision for posting of signs on those roads to notify persons of road conditions.

(c) The department, in preparing or revising the general plan, shall hold at least one public hearing in each of Mendocino and Humboldt Counties.

(d) The State Park and Recreation Commission shall conduct at least one public hearing at a location within a 100-mile radius of the park to consider approval of the department’s general plan. Notice of the hearing, the availability of copies of the department’s general plan, and the conduct of the hearing shall be in accordance with Section 5002.3.

(e) The State Park and Recreation Commission shall evaluate the
 compatibility of continued use of existing roads with the proposed uses of the park in the general plan adopted by the commission pursuant to this section. However, no county road shall be closed except with the concurrence of the board of supervisors of the county in which it is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 37, Sec. 1.   Effective March 14, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.5.

The department may accept a gift of title to the Chinese Taoist Temple in Hanford, Kings County, for the state park system in the event such gift of title is offered to the department. Before title to the Chinese Taoist Temple is offered and accepted pursuant to this section, the department shall enter into an agreement with either a local governmental entity or with a nonprofit organization for the operation of the Chinese Taoist Temple as a unit of the state park system and such agreement shall provide that all operating and maintenance costs associated with the Chinese Taoist Temple shall be at no cost to the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 268.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.6.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, and upon the adoption of a resolution of acceptance pursuant to subdivision (j), the director shall grant to the County of Los Angeles, at no cost to the county, in trust for the people of the State of California, and subject to the conditions set forth in this section, all of the rights, title, and interest of the State of California in lands, and improvements thereon, generally described as follows, and more particularly described in the deed:

(1) Parcel 1.Approximately 3.83 acres of unimproved land, known as Las Tunas State Beach.

(2) Parcel 2.Approximately 31.21 acres of improved land, known as Topanga State Beach.

(3) Parcel 3.Approximately 46.34 acres of improved land, being a portion of Manhattan State Beach.

(4) Parcel 4.Approximately 26.03 acres of improved land, known as Redondo State Beach.

(5) Parcel 5.Approximately 18.07 acres of improved land, known as Royal Palms State Beach.

(6) Parcel 6.Approximately 30.64 acres of improved land, being a portion of Point Dume State Beach.

(7) Parcel 7.Approximately 15.12 acres of unimproved land, known as Dan Blocker State Beach, and that includes Latigo Shores.

(8) Parcel 8.Approximately 10.50 acres of improved land, being a portion of Malibu Lagoon State Beach, known as Surfrider Beach.

(b) (1) The grant in trust for the people of the State of California made pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be made upon the express condition that the County of Los Angeles shall use, operate, and maintain the granted lands and improvements on the granted lands for public recreation and beach purposes in perpetuity, and shall comply with all restrictions specified in each deed and prescribed in subdivision (e). The county shall not make or permit any other use of the granted
 lands and improvements. A violation of this prohibition or a violation of subdivision (e) shall constitute a breach of conditions for purposes of paragraph (2).

(2) Upon a material breach of a condition of a grant made pursuant to this section that is determined by a court of competent jurisdiction to have been made intentionally, the State of California shall terminate the interest of the County of Los Angeles in the granted lands and improvements pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 885.010) of Title 5 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Civil Code. Upon exercise of the state’s power of termination in accordance with Section 885.050 of the Civil Code, all rights, title, and interest of the County of Los Angeles in the granted lands and improvements shall terminate and revert to, and rest in, the state, and the county shall, within 30
 days from the date of that judgment, pay to the state an amount equal to funds received by the county annually from the appropriation under Schedule (a) of Item 3680-105-516 of the Budget Act of 1995 or from any subsequent appropriation received from the state specifically for the operation or maintenance of the granted lands and improvements. However, in no event shall that payment exceed the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000). The returned funds shall be deposited into the State Parks and Recreation Fund.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 885.030 of the Civil Code, the state’s power of termination pursuant to paragraph (2) shall remain in effect in perpetuity.

(c) An operating agreement between the State of California and the County of Los Angeles
 pertaining to any of the real property described in subdivision (a), in existence at the time of the grant, shall be terminated by operation of law upon the conveyance of the real property to the County of Los Angeles.

(d) There is hereby excepted and reserved to the State of California from the grants made pursuant to subdivision (a) all mineral deposits, as defined in Section 6407, that lie below a depth of 500 feet, without surface rights of entry.

(e) The transfer of all rights, title, and interest in the lands and improvements described in subdivision (a) shall be subject to the following restrictions, which shall be specified in each deed:

(1) (A) No new or expanded commercial development shall be allowed
 on the granted real property.

(B) A project for new or expanded noncommercial development on the granted real property shall not exceed an estimated cost limitation for each project of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), as adjusted annually to reflect the California Construction Index utilized by the Department of General Services. An authorization for new and expanded noncommercial development shall be limited to projects that provide for the safety and convenience of the general public in the use and enjoyment of, and enhancement of, recreational and educational experiences, and shall be consistent with the use, operation, and maintenance of the granted lands and improvements as required pursuant to subdivision (b). The expenditure of public funds for shoreline protective works shall only be permitted for those protective works that
 the County of Los Angeles determines are necessary for the protection of public infrastructure or a public facility. For purposes of this subparagraph, “project” means the whole of an action that constitutes the entirety of the particular type of new construction, alteration, or extension or betterment of an existing structure.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraph (B), the deed for the conveyance of Royal Palms State Beach shall contain a provision that allows for the implementation of the state-approved local assistance grant (project number SL-19-003) to the County of Los Angeles already approved in the Budget Act of 1988 for noncommercial development to rehabilitate the existing park infrastructure at that state beach.

(D) The estimated cost limitation specified in subparagraph (B) shall
 not apply to the noncommercial projects necessary to bring public accessways and public facilities into compliance with the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as amended (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.). The limitation described in this subparagraph shall not affect the restriction described in subparagraph (A).

(2) The granted lands and improvements shall not be subsequently sold, transferred, or encumbered. For purposes of this section, “encumber” includes, but is not limited to, mortgaging the property, pledging the property as collateral, or any other transaction under which the property would serve as security for borrowed funds. A lease of the granted lands or improvements shall only be consistent with the public recreation and beach purposes of this section.

(f) As an alternative to the exercise of the power of termination for a material breach of conditions, each condition set forth in this section shall be enforceable as a covenant and equitable servitude through injunction for specific performance issued by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(g) On and after June 30, 1998, it is the intent of the Legislature that an application by the County of Los Angeles Fire Department to secure state funding support for boating safety and enforcement on waters within the County of Los Angeles shall be given priority consideration by the Legislature, unless an alternative source of funding is secured before that date that serves the same or similar purposes.

(h) (1) Paragraph (1) of subdivision (b), except the requirement that
 the County of Los Angeles comply with all restrictions specified in the deed, and subdivision (e) shall not apply to a portion of land within Manhattan State Beach, described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), known as “Peck’s Manhattan Beach Tract Block 5” and commonly referred to as “Bruce’s Beach.”

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, easement, covenant, restriction, or servitude, the portion of land identified in paragraph (1) may be sold, transferred, or encumbered upon terms and conditions determined by the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles to be in the best interest of the County of Los Angeles and the general public.

(3) (A) Notwithstanding Section 110 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, for purposes of determining the full cash value
 of the land identified in paragraph (1) pursuant to Section 110.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code upon its sale, transfer, or encumbrance as authorized by this subdivision, the fair market value of that real property shall be its full cash value as of the 1975 lien date, adjusted by an inflation factor determined as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 51 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(B) (i) Subject to clause (ii), under the Personal Income Tax Law (Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code) and the Corporation Tax Law (Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code), a recipient’s gross income does not include (I) any sale, transfer, or encumbrance of the portion of land identified in paragraph (1) in accordance with the procedures
 described in this section for the taxable year in which the land is sold, transferred, or encumbered and (II) any gain, income, or proceeds received in the taxable year in which the land is sold, transferred, or encumbered that is directly derived from the sale, transfer, or encumbrance of the portion of land identified in paragraph (1) in accordance with the procedures described in this section. 

(ii) This subparagraph shall apply only with respect to the first sale, transfer, or encumbrance of the portion of land identified in paragraph (1) as authorized by this subdivision that occurs after the effective date of the act adding this clause, and shall not apply with respect to any subsequent sale or disposition of that land by the recipient or any other person.

(C) Notwithstanding any
 other law, any sale, transfer, or encumbrance of the portion of land identified in paragraph (1) in accordance with the procedures described in this section shall not
 be subject to any documentary transfer tax imposed pursuant to Section 11911 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(i) For purposes of this section, the portion of land identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) shall not be subject to Section 11011.1 of the Government Code or Article 8 (commencing with Section 54220) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(j) This section shall become operative only if the Board of Supervisors of the County of Los Angeles adopts a resolution accepting the fee title grants, in trust for the people of the State of California, in accordance with this section, of the lands and improvements described in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 435, Sec. 2.   (SB 796)   Effective September 30, 2021.   Section conditionally operative as provided in subd. (j).)
-------------------------------------------

5002.7.

(a) The beach bicycle path in the County of Los Angeles, which runs 22.3 miles from its northern end at the Will Rogers State Beach to its southern end in the City of Torrance, shall be named the “Marvin Braude Bikeway” in honor of Marvin Braude, a former member of the City Council of the City of Los Angeles.

(b) Signage for the Marvin Braude Bikeway shall be placed at appropriate locations to commemorate the many conservation accomplishments of Marvin Braude, who tirelessly led
 efforts on behalf of the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, helped create the Venice Beach bikeway, and championed many other efforts to create and preserve open space and parks. Costs for the signage shall be funded by agreements made by the managing local governments and private sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 177, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

5002.8.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Avoidance area” means the lands encompassed within the avoidance area as defined in the consent decree.

(2) “Consent decree” means the judgment confirming and implementing the settlement agreement as entered by the San Diego Superior Court on January 19, 2017, for case numbers GIN051194, GIN051371, 37-2013-00049797-CU-WM-CTL, 37-2013-00050001-CU-WM-NC, and GIN051370. 

(3) “Orange County Southern Subregion
 Habitat Conservation Plan” means the habitat conservation plan developed pursuant to Section 10(a)(1)(B) of the federal Endangered Species Act (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) as approved by the United States Fish and Wildlife Service on January 10, 2007.

(4) “Protective agreement” means the Agreement to Address Traffic Congestion in South Orange County and Protect Sensitive Environmental, Cultural and Recreational Resources entered into by the Department of Transportation, the Natural Resources Agency, the Foothill/Eastern Transportation Corridor Agency, and the Save San Onofre Coalition, on or
 about March 10, 2017, pursuant to the consent decree.

(5) “Richard H. and Donna O’Neill Conservancy” means those lands that are part of the Richard H. and Donna O’Neill Conservancy and all lands that were part of the Richard H. and Donna O’Neill Conservancy on July 1, 2019.

(6) “San Onofre State Beach” means those lands that are currently part of San Onofre State Beach and all lands that were part of San Onofre State Beach on July 1, 2019, including, but not limited to, that portion of Cristianitos Road within the boundaries of San Onofre State Beach.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a joint powers agency acting pursuant to Section 66484.3 of the Government Code shall not construct, fund, or operate a major thoroughfare within the avoidance area.

(c) The authority of the Department of Transportation to approve, permit, take possession of, or otherwise authorize the construction of a major thoroughfare in the avoidance area shall be restricted in accordance with the terms and conditions of the protective agreement. 

(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a state agency, city, county, joint powers authority, regional transportation agency, or other local government entity, or any other person or entity, shall not construct, fund, approve, or otherwise authorize the building of a street, road, or highway in or on, or that encroaches on, San Onofre State Beach or the Richard H. and Donna O’Neill Conservancy.

(2) This subdivision does not apply to the construction, funding, approval, or authorization of any of the following:

(A) Any new road by the Department of Parks and Recreation that is designed primarily to serve visitors to, or for the management of, San Onofre State Beach and has the sole and exclusive
 terminus within San Onofre State Beach.

(B) Any new road by the Richard H. and Donna O’Neill Conservancy that is designed primarily to serve visitors to, or for the management of, the Richard H. and Donna O’Neill Conservancy and has the sole and exclusive terminus within the Richard H. and Donna O’Neill Conservancy.

(C) Any improvement to an existing road in San Onofre State Beach or the Richard H. and Donna O’Neill Conservancy, the primary purpose of which is to serve visitors to those facilities, but excluding improvements primarily designed to serve through traffic.

(D) Any proposed widening of the existing Interstate 5
 facility by the Department of Transportation.

(E) Other projects to widen or construct a road or a highway, including any related improvements, mitigation measures, or other requirements, that are located outside of, and do not cause direct adverse impacts to, the avoidance area.

(F) Mitigation measures that improve nonmotorized trails or natural resources within San Onofre State Beach or the Richard H. and Donna O’Neill Conservancy.

(G) Any road, improvement, or facility that encroaches on the northwestern boundary of the Richard H. and Donna O’Neill Conservancy if all of the following conditions are met:

(i) The road, improvement, or facility is a covered activity under the Orange County Southern Subregion Habitat Conservation Plan.

(ii) The road, improvement, or facility does not exceed by more than 10 percent the impacts contemplated in the Orange County Southern Subregion Habitat Conservation Plan for that road, improvement, or facility.

(iii) The entire length of the encroachment abuts the northwestern boundary of the Richard H. and Donna O’Neill Conservancy.

(e) This section does not limit the authority of the federal government to construct roads within Camp Pendleton.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 168, Sec. 2.   (AB 1426)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.

The department shall administer, protect, develop, and interpret the property under its jurisdiction for the use and enjoyment of the public. Except as provided in Section 18930 of the Health and Safety Code, the department may establish rules and regulations not inconsistent with law for the government and administration of the property under its jurisdiction. The department may expend all moneys of the department, from whatever source derived, for the care, protection, supervision, extension, and improvement or development of the property under its jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 897, Sec. 2.   Effective September 19, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.01.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the East Bay Regional Park District is contemplating the development of extensive new marina facilities at the Robert W. Crown Memorial State Beach and that the 20-year term authorized by law would be insufficient to enable any concessionaire to amortize the type and scale of improvements that the district would require the concessionaire to make at the marina.

Accordingly, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5080.18, the term of a concession contract entered into by the East Bay Regional Park District for the development and operation of a new marina at the Robert
 W. Crown Memorial State Beach may be for a period not exceeding 50 years ; provided, that the contract shall provide that the rental rates be reviewed and adjusted every five years to reflect market rates and conditions prevailing in the area in which the concession is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 457, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.02.1.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the department and the City of Grover Beach, in a joint project, are in the process of entering into an operating agreement for the purpose of negotiating a concession contract for the development of extensive new facilities at Pismo Beach State Park, and that the standard, 20-year term is insufficient to enable the concessionaire to amortize the type and scale of improvements that the department and the city will require the concessionaire to make.

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that approval of commercial development at Pismo Beach State Park does not provide precedent for commercial development in other units of the state park system and is a one-time exception to Sections 5019.53 and 5080.03 by reason of the following circumstances:

(1) The general plan for the state park provides for the project.

(2) The site is located on the perimeter of the state park and adjacent to State Route 1.

(3) The development will not impact the resources or the public’s use of the state park.

(4) The land proposed to be developed is suitable for commercial development.

(c) Pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5080.18, the term of the concession contract entered into by the department and the City of Grover Beach with a concessionaire for the development of new facilities at Pismo Beach State Park may be for a period not to exceed 50 years if the contract also provides that the rent be reviewed and adjusted at least every five years to reflect market rates and economic conditions prevailing in the area in which the concession is located.

(d) No contract subject to this section may be advertised for bid, negotiated, renegotiated, or amended in any material respect unless the Legislature reviews and approves the proposed contract in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 70, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.03.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to provide for the acquisition, planning, and operation of a state park project located on the east shore of the San Francisco Bay. The state park project shall consist of a contiguous shoreline park and bay trail along the east shore of the San Francisco Bay from the Bay Bridge to the Marina Bay Trail in Richmond, serving as a recreational facility within its natural setting developed in concert with a public planning process agreeable to the state and the East Bay Regional
 Park District.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Department” means the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(2) “District” means the East Bay Regional Park District.

(3) “Shoreline park” means a state park project as described in subdivision (a).

(c) For the purpose of the acquisition, planning, and development of the shoreline park, the district shall act as agent for the state and, as the state’s agent, shall have the authority to exercise all of the district’s powers for the purposes of acquiring, planning, and developing the shoreline park. The district shall be reimbursed by the state for any direct costs that the district incurs in
 carrying out these activities, upon appropriation therefor by the Legislature. By appointing the district as agent for the state, it is the intent of the Legislature to direct the state and the district to act in an expeditious manner towards the acquisition, planning, and development of the shoreline park.

(d) The department and the district shall negotiate, in good faith, an agreement specifying the activities necessary to accomplish the acquisition, planning, and development of the shoreline park. The agreement shall set forth the roles and responsibilities of the district and the department. Upon execution of the agreement, the remainder of the funds in Items 3790-490-742(2) and 3790-490-721(0.5) of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 1992 shall be encumbered for the purposes set forth in the agreement.

(e) All property interests acquired pursuant to this section shall be held
 as a unit of the state park system.

(f) All costs associated with the appraisal and acquisition process, including any costs necessary to test for the presence of toxic wastes, hazardous wastes, or hazardous substances, shall come from bond funds which have been designated for the shoreline park project acquisition.

(g) The district shall not assume any responsibility or liability or costs associated with the necessary cleanup of any pollution or remediation of other environmental problems that exist as of January 1, 1993, or that may thereafter arise, on any property acquired for the shoreline park using state funds.

(h) The district, in consultation with the affected cities and their citizens, shall develop, in accordance with its master plan process, a land use development plan for the shoreline park, which, upon
 completion, shall be submitted to the department for approval. The land use development plan shall be consistent with the general plans of the affected cities. The district and the department shall utilize the 1982 Feasibility Study as the initial planning document for the shoreline park, recognizing that the park shall be a recreational facility harmonious with its natural setting.

(i) When a parcel of land is determined to be available for acquisition for the shoreline park, the district shall notify the department and the department shall expeditiously pursue through the appropriate state process the release of the necessary funding for the acquisition, including all related costs, from funds available pursuant to subparagraph (I) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 5907.

(j) Upon completion of the acquisition and planning process, the full remediation of any and all
 environmental problems, and provision of funding for the development and operation and maintenance of the park, the department and the district shall negotiate , in good faith, a mutually acceptable agreement for the management and operation of the shoreline park.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.05.

Rules and regulations adopted pursuant to Section 5003 shall also apply on any granted or ungranted tidelands or submerged lands abutting property of the department and used for recreational purposes by members of the general public in conjunction with their use of the department’s property between the boundary of the lands under the jurisdiction of the department and a line running parallel to and 1,000 feet waterward of the ordinary high water mark, so long as the rule or regulation being applied is not inconsistent with any rule or regulation of any other public agency which is applicable to those tide or submerged lands.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 679, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.06.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the director may grant, in trust, and subject to the conditions set forth in this section, all of the rights, title, and interest of the State of California in all lands located within the boundaries of Durham Ferry State Park, including any improvements on those lands, to the San Joaquin County Office of Education.

(b) The San Joaquin County Office of Education shall use and maintain any lands, and any improvements thereon, that
 are granted to the office pursuant to subdivision (a) only for park, recreational, or educational purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 374, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.1.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the public interest to permit hunting, fishing, swimming, trails, camping, campsites, and rental vacation cabins in certain state recreation areas, or portions thereof, when it is found by the State Park and Recreation Commission that multiple use of state recreation areas would not threaten the safety and welfare of other state recreation area users. Hunting shall not be permitted in any unit now in the state park system and officially opened to the public on or before June 1, 1961, or in any unit hereafter
 acquired and designated by the commission as a state park, state marine reserve, state marine park, state reserve, state marine conservation area, or state marine cultural preservation area, and may only be permitted in new recreational areas and state marine recreational management areas that are developed for that use.

Whenever hunting or fishing is permitted in a state recreation area or state marine recreational management area, and whenever fishing is permitted in a state park, state marine park, state marine cultural preservation area, or state marine conservation area, the Department of Fish and Game shall enforce hunting and fishing laws and regulations as it does elsewhere in the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 610, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.2.

Without limiting any statutory powers of the Department of Parks and Recreation, real property which is in the control and possession and under the jurisdiction of the Department of Parks and Recreation shall be subject to the provisions of Division 3 (commencing with Section 11000), Title 2 of the Government Code that relate to the disposition of state-owned real property.

Every transaction entered into pursuant to Division 3 (commencing with Section 11000), Title 2 of the Government Code affecting such real property, shall be subject to the approval of the Department of Parks and Recreation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 964.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.3.

The State Park and Recreation Commission shall allow, in accordance with Section 5003.1, waterfowl hunting annually from the opening day of hunting season for ducks or geese, whichever is earlier, to and including the closing day of this season, whichever is later, as established by the Fish and Game Commission, in all of Franks Tract State Recreation Area, except within 200 feet of or on the 330 acre island known as the Little Franks Tract, which is bounded on the south and west by Piper Slough, on the north by False River, and on the east by the open water portion of Franks Tract State Recreation Area. A map of the portions of
 Franks Tract State Recreation Area open to hunting shall be available at the delta area office at Brannan Island State Recreation Area for examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 753, Sec. 1.   Effective September 8, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.35.

Notwithstanding Section 5003.1, waterfowl hunting shall be allowed at the Lake Earl and Lake Talawa project in accordance with the existing interagency agreement with the Department of Fish and Game and with regulations of the Fish and Game Commission governing waterfowl hunting at the project. The agreement shall be extended until such time as the project is classified as a unit of the state park system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1256, Sec. 2.   Effective September 19, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.4.

(a) There shall be provided in each state park in which camping is permitted those parking facilities for recreational vehicles, as defined by Section 18010 of the Health and Safety Code, that can be accommodated within the park consistent with the objective of providing camping facilities for the public in these parks. In addition, the Department of Parks and Recreation may acquire, install or permit the
 installation of, and operate or permit the operation of, camping cabins, as defined by Section 18862.5 of the Health and Safety Code, and parking facilities for recreational vehicles within the units of the state park system, if the installation and operation is consistent with the classification of the park system unit and with the general plan of the unit, if one exists.

(b) The department may enter into agreements with qualified nonprofit organizations, as defined in subdivision (g) of Section 5080.42, for acquisition, installation, and operation of camping cabins or parking facilities for recreational vehicles as described in subdivision (a), within units of the state park system. The agreements shall be subject to the requirements of Section 5080.42.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 559, Sec. 2.   (AB 549)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5003.5.
